nb: Vinstil: Aromatisert; Dessert; Sterkvin; Isvin; Musserende; Svakvin; Annet
tr: Şarap stili: Aromatize; Tatlı; Güçlendirilmiş; Buz; Köpüklü; Köpüksüz; Diğer
fi: Viinin tyyppi: Aromatisoitu; Jälkiruokaviini; Väkevöity; Jääviini; Kuohuva; Hiilihapoton; Muu
ro-RO: Stilul vinului: Aromatizat; Desert; Fortificat; De gheață; Spumant; Liniștit; Altele
hr-HR: Stil vina: Aromatizirano; Desertno; Pojačano; Ledeno; Pjenušavo; Mirno; Ostalo
zh-CN: 葡萄酒风格: 加香; 甜型; 加强型; 冰酒; 起泡; 静态（无气泡）; 其他
sl-SI: Stil vina: Aromatizirano; Desertno; Fortificirano; Ledeno; Peneče; Mirno; Drugo
zh-TW: 葡萄酒風格: 加香; 甜酒; 加烈; 冰酒; 氣泡; 靜態; 其他
cs: Styl vína: Aromatizované; Dezertní; Fortifikované; Ledové; Šumivé; Tiché; Jiné
th: สไตล์ไวน์: ไวน์แต่งกลิ่น; ของหวาน; ไวน์ผสมเหล้าสปิริต; ไอซ์; สปาร์กลิง; สติล; อื่นๆ
de: Weinstil: Aromatisiert; Dessertwein; Gespriteter Wein; Eiswein; Schaumwein; Stillwein; Sonstige
bg-BG: Винен стил: Ароматизирано; Десертно; Подсилено; Ледено; Пенливо; Тихо; Друго
hu: Borstílus: Aromatizált; Desszertbor; Likőrbor; Jégbor; Pezsgőbor; Csendes bor; Egyéb
es: Estilo de vino: Aromatizado; De postre; Fortificado; De hielo; Espumoso; Tranquilo; Otro
sk-SK: Štýl vína: Aromatizované; Dezertné; Fortifikované; Ľadové; Šumivé; Tiché; Iné
lt-LT: Vyno stilius: Aromatizuotas; Desertinis; Spirituotas; Ledo; Putojantis; Neputojantis; Kita
nl: Wijn stijl: Gearomatiseerd; Dessert; Versterkt; IJs; Mousserend; Stil; Overige
ru: Стиль вина: Ароматизированное; Десертное; Крепленое; Ледяное (айсвайн); Игристое; Тихое; Другое
en: Wine style: Aromatized; Dessert; Fortified; Ice; Sparkling; Still; Other
pt-BR: Vinho estilo: Aromatizado; Sobremesa; Fortificado; Ice; Espumante; Tranquilo; Outro
ko: 와인 스타일: 가향; 디저트; 주정 강화; 아이스; 스파클링; 스틸; 기타
sv: Vinstil: Aromatiserat; Dessert; Starkvin; Isvin; Mousserande; Stilla; Övrigt
pt-PT: Estilo de vinho: Aromatizado; Sobremesa; Fortificado; Gelo; Espumante; Tranquilo; Outro
el: Στυλ κρασιού: Αρωματισμένο; Επιδόρπιο; Ενισχυμένο; Πάγου; Αφρώδες; Ήσυχο; Άλλο
it: Stile del vino: Aromatizzato; Da dessert; Fortificato; Vino di ghiaccio; Spumante; Fermo; Altro
ja: ワインスタイル: アロマタイズド; デザート; フォーティファイド; アイス; スパークリング; スティル; その他
fr: Style de vin: Aromatisé; De dessert; Fortifié; De glace; Effervescent; Tranquille; Autre
da: Vinstil: Aromatiseret; Dessertvin; Hedvin; Isvin; Mousserende; Stille; Andet
pl: Styl wina: Aromatyzowane; Deserowe; Wzmacniane; Lodowe; Musujące; Spokojne; Inny
vi: Phong cách rượu vang: Ướp hương; Tráng miệng; Cường hóa; Rượu vang tuyết; Vang sủi bọt; Không ga; Khác